C#/Advanced Features/Auto Hyphenation/HyphDictDe.tex
\patterns{%
.ab1a
.ab3l
.abo2
.ab3ol
.ab1or
.ab3s2
.ab3u
.ade3n
.aft2
.ag2a
.ago1
.ag4r
.ag2u
.ai2s
.akt2a
.al2e
.ale3u2
.al3lei
.al3len
.al3lo3
.al3se
.al2tei
.al2tel
.al4terp
.alter4s3
.al2tra
.al2tu
.ampe4
.amt2s1
.ana1c
.an4a3t
.an3d2
.anden4k
.and4ri
.an1e
.ang2
.an3gli
.an3go
.ang4s4
.angst3
.ani2s
.an3k4
.an3s2
.an4si.
.an2tar
.an3z4
.ap3p4le.
.ari1
.ar3k2a
.ar2m3ac
.ar4mun
.ar2sc
.ar4t3ei
.arter2
.ar4t3erh
.ar2t1r
.arz2
.as2b
.as2ko
.as4sest
.as4t
.as2zen
.ata1
.at2h
.au3d
.au4f3
.au6fac
.aufs4
.au2s1
.aussen6du
.au4s3tes
.auß2
.ax2
.är4schl
.ät2h
.ät2s
.äu3
.bahn3
.baus4
.be3erb
.beige2
.bei4ge.
.beige4s
.bel2a
.be3r2a
.ber2e
.ber2g3a
.berga4s
.ber4g3e4b
.ber4gin
.ber2g3r
.ber4tr
.be4ster
.bi4os
.bi2t
.bit1a
.boge2
.bo4s3k
.brut3s
.bu4cher
.bu2ser
.bus3se
.bussy4
.bü3b
.bübe3
.ce2ra
.ch2
.champi4o
.char4mes
.chi3er
.ch6lor
.dab4
.da4ch3en
.da2r1
.dar3in
.dar2m1
.da2te.
.da2tes
.de2al
.de1i
.dein2
.de3lo
.de3na
.den2ka
.den2kl
.den2ko
.de1o2
.de3r2en
.derma3
.dermas4
.des4pe
.des3s
.diä2r
.di3el
.dien2
.diensta6d
.do3b
.do4mo
.do3pe
.dor2f1
.do2tr
.dys1
.ebe2r1
.eg2o
.eh2e
.ehe1i
.ehe5n
.ei3e4
.ei3f2e
.ei4fr
.ei3k
.ei4na
.ein3d
.ei2ne2
.ein3eb
.ei3n4erl
.eins4
.ein3sp
.eise4
.ei2sp
.eis3s2
.ei4s3t
.ei2tr
.eke2
.ek3li
.el2bi
.el2bl
.elb3s
.el2fei
.el2fl
.em3m2
.en1
.en4da
.en2d3er2
.en2d3r
.en4dü
.en3ga
.en2gl
.enk2
.enn2
.enns3
.en4ta
.en4t3ei
.en5thalp
.en4t3io
.en2t3r
.en3trop
.ents2
.epi1
.epi3c
.ep3p
.er2bei
.er6brecht
.er2bu
.er2dan
.erden4k
.er2d3er
.er1e
.ere3c
.er2em
.erf4
.er1i
.ers4
.er4stein
.erster4
.er4sterb
.er6stritt.
.er8stritten.
.er2z3el
.er2zen2
.es3p
.es2st
.es4t
.esta2
.est4e
.est3r
.et2s
.eu3
.eug4
.eur4
.ever3
.ext4
.fäs3se
.fe3la3
.feri3
.fer2no
.fi3d4
.fi2le.
.fi2len
.fi2s
.flö4s5se.
.flö6s5sen.
.flö4sses
.flu2g1
.fs2
.fu2sc
.ga4me.
.gan2ga
.gas1
.ga4s3e
.ga4sp
.ga4sten
.ga4su
.ga2t
.gd2
.gebe2a
.geb2l
.gel2b3r
.gel2d1
.ge3lu
.ge5nar
.gen4aug
.ge3n4e
.ge3n2o
.gente4
.ge3r2a
.ger2e
.ge3ro
.ge3s4
.glan2
.glanz3
.gla2s3t
.grif4fes
.gs4t
.gus2
.hal3le
.halt4e
.han2f
.hau2t1
.he2
.he4bei
.he3le
.he4r3an
.he3rat
.her4b3ra
.he3rer
.he3ri
.he4r3inn
.hin3u
.ho4c
.hof1
.ho4fen
.ho4met
.hou2
.höch2
.ia2
.il3
.im2a
.ima2ge
.imm2
.im5mu
.in1
.ind2
.in3gl
.ink2
.in3n2e
.in3sk
.in3t2
.inu1
.io4d
.ioni1
.ire3
.is2a
.istri3
.it2h
.iv2
.joni1
.ka2b3l
.ka2i
.ka5ka
.kal2a
.ka3le
.ka3t2a
.kat3i
.ka4ti4o
.ken4num
.ker3s
.ki2e
.ko3b
.kopf1
.kor2da
.kraf2
.ks2
.kus2
.la3be
.lan4de4mi
.lat3s
.le4ar
.le2gas
.leh4me
.le3n2i
.lich6ter6sc
.li2f
.li2ve.
.lo2g3in
.lo2sc
.lo4sk
.los3s4
.lo2tr
.lo3ver
.lö4ss
.lös3se
.lus4
.lu2ste
.luster4
.lu2str
.lut2h
.ly2s1
.ma3d
.mal4e
.mani2e
.ma2str
.mat4c
.matu3
.md2
.mel2a
.me3ne
.me3no
.men4schl
.men4schw
.ment2
.mes4sp
.mi2f
.mik4
.mil2z1
.mi2t1
.mm2
.na3no
.na3t
.näs5c
.nebe4n
.ner2f
.ne1ro
.nich2
.nicht3e
.ni2e
.ni3k4l
.no2c
.no2s
.nul2
.nus2
.ob1a
.obe2
.ober3ei
.ob3i2t
.och3
.oe2
.of2e
.ohr5s
.oper4
.op3fe
.or2a
.ord4e
.or3g
.or3k2
.ort2
.orts3e
.os3s
.os4t
.ost1a4
.oste2
.ost3end
.osten4de
.oste4re
.ost5erwe
.ost3i
.ost3r
.ot1a
.ou2t
.ozo4
.öl3l
.pab4
.par2kl
.part2h
.pe2c
.pe3le
.pe3na
.pe4ste
.pf2
.pf4l
.pf4r
.ph2
.ph4t
.poka2
.po4stei4
.po6steig
.po2str
.ps2
.rabe4
.ra3ch2e
.ra3e2
.ra5me
.ra4sp
.ra4s3s
.rau2m
.rau4schl
.re3ale
.rebs2
.re3cha
.re3insz
.reis4e3i
.rei4str
.re3ke
.re2stu
.ri2as
.richt4e
.ro4a
.ro3be
.ro2e
.ro2ha
.rom4a
.ro4t3r
.ro3tu
.rö2sc
.rö4ss
.rös3se
.ruf3s
.ruh2r1
.runder4
.ru3s4ses
.rü3b
.rücker4
.rü4ss
.sa3br
.sali1
.sali3e
.sami1
.sa3sse
.sas4sen.
.sau1
.säs4
.sch4
.schaf6t7end
.scho5s6se.
.scho7s6ses.
.se2ei
.seein2
.se2ha
.sein2
.sen3de
.sen4f3
.sen3s
.se3re
.seri3e
.se1ro
.ser2u
.se2t1
.sha4
.si4en
.si1er
.si3gn
.sini3
.si2te
.ski1e
.sour2
.spani5er.
.spä5s4
.spiege6lei
.st2
.st4a
.stau8becken.
.st4e
.ste2i
.steiner6k
.sto4re
.st4r
.stras4
.st4u
.sui4te.
.sy5st
.tage4s5
.tal3l
.tan2k3a
.tank3l
.ta3ra
.tar3t2
.ta2t1h
.ta2to
.ta4tor
.ta2t1u
.te2e
.te2f
.tehe3
.teiler4s
.tei6l5ersc
.te3le
.te3no
.tens4
.te1ra
.te4stei
.te4stel
.test3r
.ti2a
.ti2e
.ti2me
.ti4mes
.ti3r
.ti2s
.tischen4
.ti6sch5end
.tite4
.tode2
.to2der
.to2n
.to4nat
.to3nes
.ton1i
.to4nin
.tons2
.to4pl
.to2pr
.to2w
.tra4s3
.ts2
.tse3
.ts4u
.tu3ra
.tu3ri
.turm1
.tur2ma
.ub2
.ufe2
.ufer3
.ul2b3
.um3
.ume2
.umo2
.un3a4
.un3d
.une4
.un3g2
.uni2t
.ur3a2d
.ural4
.uran4fa
.ur1c
.ur1e
.ur2e3t
.ur2inf
.urin2s
.ur3o4m
.ur1o2p
.ur3s2
.ut2a
.ut3r
.ve5n2e
.vol2
.vo4r
.wah4l
.wa2s
.weg5s
.weine2
.wei2ta
.welter4e
.wer4ker
.wer4kr
.wer2tr
.wetterer6
.wi4e
.wor2
.wort3en4
.wur2f1
.xe3
.ya4l
.zel4la4
.zelle4
.zel4lei
.zeug2i
.zi2e
.zie2l3u
.zin2ka
.zin2s3c
.zin2st
.zol2
.zuch2
.zug3l
.zu2gra
.zweigen4
.zwei6g5end
a1ab
aa1c
a1a2ce
aa2gr
a1akt
a2al
aa2l1a
aale3ne
aa3lep
a1an
a3an.
a1a2q
2a2ar
aa2r3a
aar3b
aar3d
aa3rea
aa2rei
aarf4
aar3g2
aar3k4
aart4
1aas
aas3t
aa2th
aa2t3r
aat4s3
2a3au
a1ä2
2aba
3abad
ab1alt
a3b2am
ab2ant
ab1au
ab2aut
ab1ä
ab2är
ab2äu
2abbat
2abbin
1abd
ab5dec
2abe.
2abec
ab1eic
abe3id
ab1eil
ab1ein
2ab2el
abe2l1a
abela2d
abe2le
2aben.
1abent
2aber
a2berd
ab1er2k
ab1er2r
ab1er2z
4abes
abe2s1e
ab3esse
ab1eß
2a3bet
2abew
1abf
1abg
3abga
1abh
ab5hän
2abi
4abil
ab1ins
ab1ir
ab1it
abi4tur
1abk
ab1l
1a2bla
a3blat
1a2blä
a2b3led
3ab3lei
a3blem
2ablet
ab3li
a2blin
ab4lit
2ablo
1a2blö
a2blu
abma3s
1abn
2abo
3a2bo.
ab2of
3a2bon
4abot
2abö
ab3r
a4brä
a2bre
ab4ros
2ab4rö
1absc
1abse
1ab3sp
abs4t2
3absta
1abstu
3abtei
3abtr
2abu
abu3g
a2bum
ab1ur
2abü
1abw
2a3by
3abz
2ac.
2a3ca
1ac1c
2acci
a1cem
a1cen
a1cet
a4ch.
ach1a
a3chari
ach3as
ach3au
2achb
2a1che
a2ch1e2c
ach1ei
ach2ei.
a2chep
a2cherf
a2ch3erh
a2ch3erl
a2cherö
a2ch3erw
2achf
2a1chi
a2chim
ach3l
2ach3m
ach3n
a1cho
a3cho.
a2cho2r
ach3öf
4ach3r
a4chs
2achsc
achs2el
ach3s2i
achs2or
ach3su
a4cht
ach2tak
ach4terh
ach4tersp
ach4t3erw
ach2t1o
acht3rat
ach4traum
ach6träume.
ach8träumen.
ach4trit
acht4s3al
ach2tum
a1chu
ach1u4f
ach3ü
2achv
4ach3w
a1ci
2acke.
ack3erz
ackmu4
ackmus3
ack2sp
acksta2
2a1cl
a3co
acon4n
2acu
2ad.
2ada.
4adab
ad2abr
ad2ag
adai4
ad1an
3adap
4a3d2a2r3
2adas
2adat
a2d1au
a3dau.
1a2dä1
ad1c
1add
2ade.
ade2al
a3dec
a3dee
adefi2
2adeg
a3dell
2aden
a3den1a
ade4nat
adeo4
ade1ra
a2d1erk
4ades
ade3s4p
ades2s
2adf
2adh
2adi
adi3en
adi3er.
adie4sc
3adj
2adli
4admu
ad2ob
ado2n
ado4na
a2dop
2adp
2adq
a2dre
2ad3rec
ad3rei
ad3run
2ads2
ad3sz
ad2t1
adte2
ad4tor
ad4tro
1adv
2ady
2a1e1
ae2b
a2ec
ae2d
aed4r
ae2i
a2ek
a2el
a3el.
a4ela
a3els
ae2m
ae2n1
ae2o3
aeop2
ae2p
3a2er2o
a2es
aes4a
ae4sc
ae4ta
a2e3u
a2ew
ae2x
a2f
2a3fa
a4f1ab
a4f1a2n
a4fap
a4f1au
2a3fä
a4f1än
2a3fe
a4f1ec
a4fentl
a4f1ep
a4fex
a3fé
aff4a
af2f3l
aff4th
2a3fi
afi4kanz
afi2kat
afi2t
2af3l
af1la
a3f4lu
2a3fo
a4f3oc
a4ford
a4f1ort
2afra
af3rau
af3rä
af3re
2afro
af3rö
af4rü
af3s2a
af3sh
af2si
af2sp
afs4t
af2t1a
af3tat
af2tei
af2te2l
aft2erk
af2t1o
af2tö
aft3r
af2tra
aft5rei
aft4stä
af2tur
a3fu
a4f3ur
2a3fü
2ag.
2aga
a3ga.
ag1a2b
ag1a2d
ag1am
ag1ar
a2g1au
ag2del
ag2dr
ag2du
4age.
age2l3ei
age2ler
4a3gen.
age2neb
a2gentu
2ages
age4sam
age3sc
age4s3in
age4so
ages3p
ages4sen
age4s3ti
3aggr
a2g1id
a2gim
ag1inn
2a2gl
ag4lan
ag4las
ag3le
a4glö
2agm
ag2n2
ag4nat
a4gnä
ag4ne
ag5neh
ag4nu
ago3b
ag1op
agori2
ag3rat
a2g3re
a2gri
ag3rie
ag3rin
2ags
ag3s2ah
ag4sam
ag3schi
ag3s2eid
ag5s4porta
agst2
ags4tan
ag2str
2agt
ag2th
2agu
a2gund
2ah.
2a1ha
ah2an
ah4at
a1hä
2a1he
ahe1in
a2h1er2h
ahe3u
a1h2i
ahin3
ah2l3a2
ah2l1ä
ah2l1ei
ah2lel
ahle4na
ah4l3erd
ah4l3erh
ahl1o2
ah2lö
ahl3sz
ahme1i
ah3mu
ah4n3a
ah2nä
ah3nee
ah2nef
ahn3el
ah4nerd
ahner4e
ah2nerl
ah4ner4le
ahner2n
ah4nin
ah2no
ahn3t
1a2hor
ah1os
ah3ös
ahr1a
ah3r2e
ahre4s5
ah3ri
ahrta2
ahr2ti
ahr2tri
ahr2tro
ahr2tun
ah2ta
ah2te2l
ah2t1ex
ah2t3r
aht3s4
2a1hu
ah3w
a1hy
2ai.
ai1a2
a1ia.
aia4p
2aib
ai2bl
aid4s
aids3t
ai1e2
ai3e4n1
aif2
ai3fr
ai3g2
aig4r
a3ik.
a4i3ke
ai2lar
ail3d4
ai2lei
ail3g
ai2lo
2ain
ain2a
a1ind
ai3n4e
ai4neb
ain3s
3airb
ai2sa
a3isch.
ai3schw
ai3s2e
ais3sen
ais5st
ai2sti
a2it
ait4r
a3iv.
a3ivl
a3ivs
a2jat
ajekt4o
a2k
2ak.
a3ka
2aka.
2aka3b
akab4r
a4kad
2akal
2akam
2akan
2akar
ak4at
akat1a
aka2tak
1a4kaz
2a3kä
2akb
2akc
2akd
2a3ke
a4kef
a4k1em
a4keo
ak2et
a4keu
2a3ki
ak1ins
1akku
2ak3l
a3k4la
ak5lad
ak5lan
ak4li
3aklö
ak4lu
ak5lun
a3kna
ak3no
2a3ko
2a3kr
ak3res
ak4ri
3akro3
a4k3rü
2aks
ak3sh
ak2t1a2b
ak3tan
2aktb
ak2tel
ak3ten
ak3t2er
2aktg
2aktik
2aktis
2aktm
ak2to4b
ak2tö
ak2t3r
ak3t4ri
2aktsi
2aktsp
2aktst
2aktun
2aktw
a3ku
2akun
a4kup
2akur
2a3kü
1akz
3akze
a1la
2ala.
4alabo
a2l3abt
al1ac
al1af
2alai
al1akr
al1am
al1ana
2aland
a2l1ang
al1anz
al1app
a3lar.
al3arc
a3lare
al2arm
2al1arr
a2lart
ala2s
a3lat.
alat3s
alat5t
alat3z
al1au
al3aug
a1lä
a2l1äm
al1än
al1är
a3läs
al1äu
3albat
al2bär
al2berh
al2b3er2w
al2b1l
al2boh
al2bon
alb3ru
alb5st
alb6st.
al4dan
al2dä
al2d3erl
al2d3ern
alde2s
ald3inn
ald1r
al2drä
2ale
4a3le.
ale4ar
a2l1e2b
al1eck
a4l1ef
a2l1ei
a3l2eic
a4lein
a2l1el
5a2lema
a2l1e2mi
al1emp
4a3len.
alende2
al3endr
al3ends
a2leng
al2enn
al1epo
4a3ler.
a2l1erb
aler2e
a2l1erf
a2l1er2h
aler2kl
a2l3erl
al1erm
aler4mi
a2l1er4r
aler3s
a2l1ert
aler3w
3a2l3erwä
4ales
a2l1e4sk
a2less
a4leth
a2l1eu
alf4r
1alge.
3algi
al2gli
al3glo
1algo
3algor
2ali
al2imb
al1imm
ali2nal
al1ind
alin2ge
a2l1in2q
al1ins
alken1
al2klö
al2kne
al2kof
1alkoh
alk3s2
al2lab
al3la3d
alla4me
al2lan
al2l1a2r
al4later
al2lä
al3läu
al4lec
3allee
alle2gi
al4leh
al3lend
aller2z
al5les
alle3se
al2leu
al2lid
alli3er.
alli5ers.
al2lob
al2lo2c
al2lop
al2lo2s
al2lö2
all3öse
al4lt
al2luf
allu4s
al2lü4s
al2map
al4m3ast
almo4de.
2alo
4alo.
a2l1ob
3a2loe
a2l1of
4alog
alo2ga
alo2gr
alo3is.
al1ont
alori2
al1ort
4alos
a2l1ö
al2ös
3alp.
3alpe.
1alph
al2pho
al3sak
al2schm
al4sh
al3skl
als2p
al4ss
als4te
al2sum
al2t1ak
alt3alg
al2tan
al2tat
al2tau
1altä
al4tb
al4td
alt3eis
alt3elt
al2temu
alter3f
alt3er4pr
al2teu
al2tid
al2tin
alt1op
al2tö
alt3rad
al2t3rat
al2tre
al2t3ri
al4t3ro
a1lu
alu3b4
al2uf
alu3g
al1u2k
a2lum
al1umb
a2l1ur
a3lus
2aly
al2zar
al2zau
al3zen
alz2erk
al2zw
a2m
2am.
a3m2a
ama2ba
ama3d2
ama3g
1amal
a4malg
2am4an
ama2sta
1a4maz
2a3mä
a3me
4ame.
2amel
2am2e4n1
amen4spr
amen2t3r
a5mer.
ame3r2a
amera3u
a4m1erf
1a4meri
ame5r2u
2ames
a4mesh
2amet
a3mé
2amf
a3mi
ami2k
2amir
2amit
2amk
2aml
2amm.
am2ma2c
2am2mal
amma2n
am2mar
am2mas
amma2sc
am2maß
am2ma2te
am2mä
ammen4ge.
ammes3
am2mid
ammi2e
am2min
am2mit
4amml
am4mo2d
am2m1ö
ammu2
amm3unt
am4mus
am4mü
amni1
a3mo
2ampe.
2ampen
amp2f1a2
2am2ple
2ampo
am3pr
am5pre
2ams
4amsc
am2schl
3amse
ams1en
am3sh
1amt.
am2t1a2
am4tau
am2t1ä
amt3eig
am2tel
amter4
am2terh
am2t3ern
am2t1ex
am2tis
am2tit
am2to
am4tou
am2tö
am2t3r
am4tre
am4ts
am2t1u
2am4tv
2a3mu
3a4mul
a3mü
a3my
2ana.
2anab
ana3c
an2ad
anadi1
an2ag
2a3nak
an1alg
ana2lin
an2a5ma
2anan
an4and
2anas
a5nat.
ana4th
a5n4atm
a2nato
ana2tr
a5nats
an3aug
1a2n1äs
1anb
2anbas
2anbö
2anbu
an3ch
2and.
3an3d2ac
and3ei
an2deng
anden4ga
an2d3ent
ander2e
and3erob
an3de2s
an2d1ex
and2sas
and2seh
and2so
and4spar
and4spas
and4s3paß
and2su
4andu2
an2d1ur
2ane
4ane.
an3ec
a3nee
an2ei.
an3eif
3aneig
a4neis
3a2n1e4k
ane4l
an1e2mi
a2nemo
4anen
4aner.
aner2fa
an2erh
a2nerke
4anern
a4nerz.
an2erze
an1eth
3anex
1anf
2anf.
2anfab
3anfä
an3fe
2anfi
anf3le
2anfors
2anfs
an3f2u
2anfun
4ang.
1anga
2anga.
an2g1ar
2angas
2angd
2ange.
1angeb
an2g1ei
an3gen
an2g3erf
an2g3er2h
an2g3er2w
an2g3erz
2anges.
2angf
2angh
2angie
ang1l
an2gla
ang3n
ang5na
ang1r
ang3ra
an3gri
2angs.
ang4sto
angt2
1an3h
2anhau
2a3ni
an2i3d
4anie
aniel2l
ani3els
ani3ers.
anig2
ani2ka
ani3ke
3a4nim
a4nind
ani2o
an3i4on
a4n3iso
anis4t
2anj
2ank.
an2kag
an2k1ak
an2kan
an2kei
2anken
ank3erfa
an3kes
2anki
an2kid
an2klö
an2klu
ank3no
an2k3opf
an2kor
ank1r
ank3ra
an2kras
ank3rä
an2kro
2anks
ank3se
2ankt4
3ankü
1anl
2anlad
3anlag
anma3s2
2anmo
1anmu
2ann.
an3na
1annah
an4nar
an3ne
an4nef
an4nei
an4nene
ann2er
2anns
ann4sp
2annt
2ano.
1an1od
2anof
2anog
2a3nol
ano2la
1a2nom
a3nom.
2anoo
an1op
a2n1or
ano2ri
2a3nos
2a1nö
2anpu
1anr
2anrö
an4same
an3sar
1an3s2ä
an4sb
1ansc
an4sf
an4sg
an3skr
1anspr
1anst
ans4te
an3s2z
2ant.
ant3ar
anta4re
an3t2ä
1antá
3antei
an3tha
1anthr
2antie
3antise
anton2
3antr
1antw
2anu
anu3r
anus3s
a1nü
1anw
2anwi
an2z1ä
2anzb
2anzd
1anzei
anz3elf
anze2n
2anzes
2anzg
2anzh
